Maine, session 132, LD723.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2804-C, sub-§4, ¶B, as amended by PL 2005, c. 331, §22, is
further amended to read:
B. Provide a structured residential and, beginning July 1, 2027, a structured
nonresidential program that balances the goals of professional policing with public
services emphasis; and